Washington statutes.
RCW 9.66.020

Unequal damage.

An act which affects a considerable number of persons in any of the ways specified in RCW 9.66.010 is not less a public nuisance because the extent of the damage is unequal.

[ 1909 c 249 s 249; Code 1881 s 1236; 1875 p 79 s 2; RRS s 2501.]